Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-5803.10
Long-term care bed, defined.

Long-term care bed means a bed in a health care facility that is or will be licensed under the Health Care Facility Licensure Act as a skilled nursing facility, intermediate care facility, nursing facility, or long-term care hospital. Long-term care beds do not include residential care beds, domiciliary beds, or swing beds. For purposes of this section, swing beds means beds which may be used by a hospital for acute or long-term care in a facility located in an area which is not designated as urban by the United States Bureau of the Census and which has up to one hundred beds, excluding beds for newborns and intensive-care-type inpatient units.

Laws 1997, LB 798, § 14;

Laws 2000, LB 819, § 117.

Health Care Facility Licensure Act, see section 71-401.